Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.100

Reports of violations by secretary—Duty to institute proceedings—Notice to alleged violator.

(1) It shall be the duty of each assistant attorney general, prosecuting attorney, or city attorney to whom the secretary reports any violation of chapter 43.20 or 43.70 RCW, or regulations promulgated under them, to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the proper courts, without delay, and to be duly prosecuted as prescribed by law.

(2) Before any violation of chapter 43.20 or 43.70 RCW is reported by the secretary to the prosecuting attorney for the institution of a criminal proceeding, the person against whom such proceeding is contemplated shall be given appropriate notice and an opportunity to present his or her views to the secretary, either orally or in writing, with regard to such contemplated proceeding.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 262.]